Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 10. Controlled Substances
§ 35-7-1014.
Substances included in Schedule I.

The controlled substances listed in this section are included in Schedule I. Schedule I shall consist of the drugs and other substances, by whatever official name, common or usual name, chemical name or brand name designated, listed in this section.

Opiates. — Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any of the following opiates, including the isomers, esters, ethers, salts and salts of isomers, esters and ethers, unless specifically excepted, whenever the existence of these isomers, esters, ethers and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation:

Acetylmethadol;

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 151, § 2.

Allylprodine;

Alphacetylmethadol (except levo-alphacetylmethadol also known as levo-alpha-acetylmethadol, levomethadyl acetate, or LAAM);

Alphameprodine;

Alphamethadol;

Alpha-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(alpha-methylbeta-phenyl)ethyl-4-piperidyl] propionanilide; 1-(1-methyl-2-phenylethyl)-4-(N-propanilido) piperidine);

Benzethidine;

Betacetylmethadol;

Betameprodine;

Betamethadol;

Betaprodine;

Clonitazene;

Dextromoramide;

Diampromide;

Diethylthiambutene;

Difenoxin;

Dimenoxadol;

Dimepheptanol;

Dimethylthiambutene;

Dioxaphetyl butyrate;

Dipipanone;

Ethylmethylthiambutene;

Etonitazene;

Etoxeridine;

Furethidine;

Hydroxypethidine;

Ketobemidone;

Levomoramide;

Levophenacylmorphan;

Morpheridine;

Noracymethadol;

Norlevorphanol;

Normethadone;

Norpipanone;

Phenadoxone;

Phenampromide;

Phenomorphan;

Phenoperidine;

Piritramide;

Proheptazine;

Properidine;

Propiram;

Racemoramide;

Tilidine;

Trimeperidine;

Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(1-methyl-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylacetamide);

Alpha-methylthiofentanyl (N-[1-methyl-2-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);

Beta-hydroxyfentanyl (N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);

Beta-hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl (other name: N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-3-methyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);

3-Methylfentanyl (N-[3-methyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);

3-Methylthiofentanyl (N-[3-methyl-1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);

MPPP (1-methyl-4-phenyl-4-propionoxypiperidine);

Para-fluorofentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl] propanamide);

PEPAP (1-(-2-phenethyl)-4-phenyl-4-acetoxypiperidine);

Thiofentanyl (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-propanamide).

Opium derivatives. — Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any of the following opium derivatives, their salts, isomers and salts of isomers whenever the existence of these salts, isomers and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:

Acetorphine;

Acetyldihydrocodeine;

Benzylmorphine;

Codeine methylbromide;

Codeine-N-Oxide;

Cyprenorphine;

Desomorphine;

Dihydromorphine;

Drotebanol;

Etorphine (except hydrochloride salt);

Heroin;

Hydromorphinol;

Methyldesorphine;

Methyldihydromorphine;

Morphine methylbromide;

Morphine methylsulfonate;

Morphine-N-Oxide;

Myrophine;

Nicocodeine;

Nicomorphine;

Normorphine;

Pholcodine;

Thebacon.

Hallucinogenic substances. — Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of the following hallucinogenic substances, their salts, isomers and salts of isomers whenever the existence of these salts, isomers and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation (for purposes of this paragraph only, the term “isomer” includes the optical, position and geometric isomers):

4-bromo-2, 5-dimethoxyamphetamine; some trade or other names: 4-bromo-2, 5-dimethoxy-alpha-methylphenethylamine; 4-bromo-2, 5-DMA;

2, 5-dimethoxyamphetamine; some trade or other names: 2, 5-dimethoxy-alpha-methylphenethylamine; 2, 5-DMA;

4-methoxyamphetamine; some trade or other names: 4-methoxy-alpha-methylphenethylamine; paramethoxy-amphetamine; PMA;

5-methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine;

4-methyl-2, 5-dimethoxyamphetamine; some trade and other names: 4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy-alpha-methylphenethylamine; “DOM”; and “STP”;

3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine;

3,4,5-trimethoxy amphetamine;

Bufotenine; some trade and other names: 3-(beta-dimethy-laminoethyl)-5-hydroxyindole; 3-(2-dimethylaminoethyl)-5-indolol; N,N-dimethylserotonin; 5-hydroxy-N, N-dimethyltryptamine; mappine;

Diethyltryptamine; some trade and other names: N,N-diethyltryptamine; DET;

Dimethyltryptamine; some trade or other names: DMT;

Ibogaine; some trade and other names: 7-ethyl-6,6 beta, 7, 8, 9, 10, 12, 13-octahydro-2-methoxy-6, 9-methano-5H-pyrido [1',2':1,2] azepino [5,4-b] indole; tabernanthe iboga;

Lysergic acid diethylamide;

Marihuana;

Mescaline;

Parahexyl; some trade or other names; 3-hexyl-1-hydroxy 7, 8, 9, 10-tetrahydro-6, 6, 9-trimethyl-6H-dibenzo [b,d] pyran; synhexyl;

Peyote; meaning all parts of the plant presently classified botanically as Lophophora Williamsii Lemaire, whether growing or not, the seeds thereof, any extract from any part of such plant, and every compound, manufacture, salts, derivative, mixture, or preparation of such plant, its seeds or extracts;

N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;

N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;

Psilocybin;

Psilocyn;

Tetrahydrocannabinols; synthetic equivalents of the substances contained in the plant or in the resinous extractives of Cannabis, sp. and/or synthetic substances, derivatives and their isomers with similar chemical structure and pharmacological activity such as the following: delta 1 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol and their optical isomers; delta 6 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol and their optical isomers; delta to the 3, 4 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol and its optical isomers. Since nomenclature of these substances is not internationally standardized, compounds of these structures, regardless of numerical designation of atomic positions are covered;

Ethylamine analog of phencyclidine; some trade or other names: N-ethyl-1-phenylcyclohexylamine, (1-phenylcyclohexyl) ethylamine, N-(1 phenylcyclohexyl) ethylamine, cyclohexamine, PCE;

Pyrrolidine analog of phencyclidine; some trade or other names: 1-(1-phenylcyclohexyl) -pyrrolidine, PCPy, PHP;

Thiophene analog of phencyclidine; some trade or other names: 1-[1-(2-thienyl)-cyclohexyl]-piperidine, 2-thienyl analog of phencyclidine, TPCP, TCP;

Alpha-ethyltryptamine; some trade or other names: etryptamine; Monase; A-ethyl-1H-indole-3-ethanamine; 3-(2-aminobutyl) indole; --ET; and AET;

4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine; some trade or other names: 2-(4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-1-aminoethane; alpha-desmethyl DOB; 2C-B, nexus;

2,5-Dimethoxy-4-ethylamphetamine; some trade or other names: DOET;

3,4-Methylenedioxymethamphetamine (MDMA);

3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine (also known as N-ethyl-alpha-methyl-3,4(methylenedioxy)phenethylamine, N-ethyl MDA, MDE, MDEA);

N-hydroxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine (also known as N-hydroxy-alpha-methyl-3,4(methylenedioxy)phenethylamine, and N-hydroxy MDA);

1-[1-(2-thienyl)cyclohexyl]pyrrolidine; some other names: TCPy;

2,5-dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylthiophenethylamine (other name: 2C-T-7), its optical isomers, salts and salts of isomers;

Alpha-methyltryptamine; (other name: AMT);

5-methoxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine; (other name: 5-MeO-DIPT), its isomers, salts and salts of isomers;

Salvinorin A;

3,4-Methylenedioxymethcathinone (other names: Methylone);

3,4-Methylenedioxypyrovalerone (MDPV);

4-Methylmethcathinone (other names Mephedrone);

3-Methoxymethcathinone;

3-Fluoromethcathinone;

4-Fluoromethcathinone;

Synthetic cannabinoids as follows:

(6aR,10aR)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol; some trade or other names: HU-210;

Dexanabinol, (6aS,10aS)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol; some trade or other names: HU-211;

Any compound structurally derived from 3-(1-napthoyl)indole, 1H-indol-3-yl-(1-naphthyl)methane, 3-(1-napthoyl)pyrrole, 3-(phenylacetyl)indole, 3-(benzoyl)indole or naphthylideneindene by substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring, pyrrole ring or 3-position of the indene ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted in the indole ring, pyrrole ring or indene ring to any extent, and whether or not substituted in the naphthyl or phenyl ring to any extent;

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 29, § 2.

Any compound containing a 2-(3-hydroxycyclohexyl)phenol structure with substitution at the 5-position of the phenolic ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group whether or not substituted in the cyclohexyl ring to any extent;

2,3-Dihydro-5-methyl-3-(4-morpholinylmethyl)pyrrolo[1,2,3-de]-1,4-benzoxazin-6-yl]-1-naphthalenylmethanone; some trade or other names: WIN 55,212-2;

[(1-(5-luoropentyl)-1H-indol-3-yl)(2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropyl)methanone]; other names: XLR-11;

[(1-pentyl-1H-indol-3-yl)(2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropyl)methanone]; other names: UR-144;

1-pentyl-8-quinolinyl ester-1H-indole-3-carboxylic acid; other names: PB-22;

1-(5-fluoropentyl)-8-quinolinyl ester-1H-indole-3-carboxylic acid; other names: 5F-PB-22;

1-pentyl-N-tricyclo[3.3.1.13,7]dec-1-yl-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide; other names: AKB48;

N-((3s,5s,7s)-adamantan-1-yl)-1-(5-fluoropentyl)1H-indazole-3-carboxamide; other names: 5F-AKB48;

N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide; other names: AB-FUBINACA;

N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-pentyl-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide; other names: ADB- PINACA;

N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-pentyl-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide; other names: AB-PINACA;

N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2yl)-1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide; other names: 5F-ADB-PINACA;

N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide; other names: 5F-AB-PINACA;

N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide; other names: AB–CHMINACA;

[1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazol-3-yl](na phthalen-1-yl)methanone; other names: THJ–2201;

1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxylic acid 8-quinolinyl ester; other names: BB-22.

2-(2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylphenyl)ethanamine; other names: 2C-E;

2-(2,5-dimethoxy-4-methylphenyl)ethanamine; other names: 2C-D;

2-(4-chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine; other names: 2C-C;

2-(4-iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine; other names: 2C-I;

2-[4-(ethylthio)-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl]ethanamine; other names: 2C-T-2;

2-[4-(isopropylthio)-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl]ethanamine; other names: 2C-T-4;

2-(2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine; other names: 2C-H;

2-(2,5-dimethoxy-4-nitro-phenyl)ethanamine; other names: 2C-N;

2-(2,5-dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylphenyl)ethanamine; other names: 2C-P;

4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-N-[(2-methoxyphenyl)methyl]-benzeneethanamine; other names: 25B- NBOMe;

2-(4-chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)ethanamine; other names: 25C-NBOMe or 2C-C-NBOMe;

4-iodo-2,5-dimethoxy-N-[(2-methoxyphenyl)methyl]-benzeneethanamine; other names: 25I- NBOMe;

3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylcathinone; (other names: ethylone).

Depressants. — Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of such salts, isomers and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:

Mecloqualone;

Methaqualone;

Gamma-hydroxybutyric (some other names include GHB; gamma-hydroxybutyrate; 4-hydroxybutyrate; 4-hydroxybutanoic acid; sodium oxybate; sodium oxybutyrate).

Stimulants. — Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts and salts of isomers:

Fenethylline;

N-ethylamphetamine;

Aminorex; some other names: aminoxaphen; 2-amino-5-phenyl-2-oxazoline; or 4,5-dihydro-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine;

Cathinone; some trade or other names: 2-amino-1-phenyl-1-propanone, alpha-aminopropiophenone, 2-aminopropiophenone, and norephedrone;

Methcathinone; some other names: 2-(methylamino)-propiophenone; alpha-(methylamino) propiophenone; 2-(methylamino)-1-phenylpropan-1-one; alpha-N-methylaminopropiophenone; monomethylpropion; ephedrone; N-methylcathinone; methylcathinone; AL-464; AL-422; AL-463 and UR1432), its salts, optical isomers and salts of optical isomers;

(1) Cis-4-methylaminorex ((1) cis-4,5-dihydro-4-methyl-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine);

N,N-dimethylamphetamine (also known as N,N-alpha-trimethyl-benzeneethanamine; N,N-alpha-trimethylphenethylamine);

N-Benzylpiperazine; (some other names: BZP, 1-benzylpiperazine), its optical isomers, salts and salts of isomers.

4-methyl-N-ethylcathinone; other names: 4-MEC; 2-(ethylamino)-1-(4-methylphenyl)propan-1-one;

4-methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinopropiophenone; other names: 4-MePPP; MePPP; 1-(4-methylphenyl)-2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)-propan-1-one;

Alpha-pyrrolidinopentiophenone; other names: alpha-PVP; alpha-pyrrolidinovalerophenone; 1-phenyl-2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)pentan-1-one;

Butylone; other names: bk-MBDB; 1-(1,3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2-(methylamino)butan-1-one;

Pentedrone; other names: alpha-methylaminovalerophenone; 2-(methylamino)-1-phenylpentan-1-one;

Pentylone; other names: bk-MBDP; 1-(1,3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2-(methylamino)pentan-1-one;

Naphyrone; other names: naphthylpyrovalerone; 1-(naphthalen-2-yl)-2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)pentan-1-one;

Alpha-pyrrolidinobutiophenone; other names: alpha-PBP; 1-phenyl-2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)butan-1-one.

Temporary listing of substances subject to emergency scheduling. Any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances:

N-[1-benzyl-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide (benzylfentanyl), its optical isomers, salts and salts of isomers;

N-[1-(2-thienyl)methyl-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide (thenylfentanyl), its optical isomers, salts and salts of isomers.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 14; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.14; Laws 1973, ch. 222, § 1; 1985, ch. 114, § 1; 1997, ch. 151, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 88, § 1; 2007, ch. 40, § 1; 2011, ch. 45, § 1; ch. 137, § 1; 2012, ch. 29, §§ 1, 2; ch. 98, § 1; 2014 ch. 50, § 1, effective March 10, 2014; 2015 ch. 136, § 1, effective March 4, 2015.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (d)(xxxii) through (d)(xxxiv); added (f)(viii); and made related changes.

The 2011 amendments. —

The first amendment, by ch. 45, § 1, effective July 1, 2011, in (d)(xxxii) and (f)(viii), inserted “its optical isomers, salts and salts of isomers”; in (d)(xxxiv), inserted “its isomers, salts and salts of isomers”; added (d)(xxxv) through (d)(xli); and made related changes.

The second amendment, by ch. 137, § 1, added (d)(xxxv).

Laws 2011, ch. 137, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2012 amendments. —

The first 2012 amendment, by ch. 29, §§ 1 and 2, effective July 1, 2012, in (d)(xlii), rewrote (d)(xlii)(C), repealed former (d)(xlii)(D), which read: “2-[(1R,3S)-3-hydroxycyclohexyl]-5-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)phenol); some trade or other names: CP 47,497.”; and added (d)(xlii)(E) and (D).

The second 2012 amendment, by ch. 98, § 1, substituted “Salvinorin A” for “Salvinorum A” in (d)(xxxv).

Laws 2012, ch. 98 § 4, makes
the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary
for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2014 amendment,

in (d)(xlii), added (G) through (S) and added (xliii) through (liv)

Laws 2014, ch. 50, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

The 2015 amendment

added (d)(xlii)(T) through (W) and (d)(xliv); in the introductory language of (f), substituted “optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts and salts of isomers” for “salts, isomers and salts of isomers”; and added (f)(ix) through (f)(xvi).

Laws 2015, ch. 135, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2015.

Application. —

Laws 2011, ch. 45, § 3 , provides: “The registration requirements for persons who manufacture, distribute or dispense controlled substances in Wyoming specified in
W.S.

35-7-1024

, as amended in section 1 of this act, shall apply to all registrations issued or renewed in calendar year 2011.”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2011, ch. 137, § 2, provides: “(a) The attorney general is authorized an additional one (1) full-time forensic analyst position to implement this act.

“(b) There is appropriated fifty-six thousand seven hundred thirty-six dollars ($56,736.00) from the general fund to the attorney general. This appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2012. This appropriation shall only be expended for the purposes of this act. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2012.”

Marijuana as distinct from hemp. —

Because the burden to establish an exception under the Wyoming Controlled Substances Act is on the person claiming the exception, defendant, who claimed to have possessed hemp, which is not a controlled substance, bore the burden of establishing that the substance was hemp, defined as cannabis with a tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) concentration of not more than 0.3 percent. Thus, sufficient evidence supported defendant’s conviction for possession of marijuana without evidence of THC concentration. Roman v. State, 2022 WY 48, 507 P.3d 453,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2022).

Provisions governing marijuana-related offenses. —

Because marijuana is a schedule I controlled substance under subsection (d)(x) (now (d)(xiii))but is not a “narcotic drug,” as that term is defined by § 35-7-1002(a)(xv), offenses involving marijuana are governed by § 35-7-1031(a)(ii) rather than § 35-7-1031(a)(i). Eaton v. State, 660 P.2d 803,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 294

(Wyo. 1983).

Applied

in

Janski v. State, 538 P.2d 271,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1975); Jackson v. State, 533 P.2d 1,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 1975); Jasch v. State, 563 P.2d 1327,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 247

(Wyo. 1977); Patterson v. State, 691 P.2d 253,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 348

(Wyo. 1984); Perry v. State, 927 P.2d 1158,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1996).

Quoted

in

Apodaca v. State, 627 P.2d 1023,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 351

(Wyo. 1981).

Stated

in

Dorador v. State, 711 P.2d 417,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 626

(Wyo. 1985); Capshaw v. State, 714 P.2d 349,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1986); Hennigan v. State, 746 P.2d 360,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 536

(Wyo. 1987).

Cited

in

Hernandez v. State, 587 P.2d 1094,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 250

(Wyo. 1978); Jelle v. State, 2005 WY 111, 119 P.3d 403,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(2005)White v. Board of Trustees, 648 P.2d 528,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 361

(Wyo. 1982); Wise v. State, 654 P.2d 116,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 402

(Wyo. 1982); Pisano v. State, 828 P.2d 666,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1992); Goettl v. State, 842 P.2d 549,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 1992); Kaldwell v. State, 908 P.2d 987,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 234

(Wyo. 1995); Medrano v. State, 914 P.2d 804,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 1996); Burns v. State, 2011 WY 5, 246 P.3d 283,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Jan. 19, 2011).

Law reviews. —

For note, “Can You Be Busted for Your Roommate's Pot? Mulligan v. State, 513 P.2d 180,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 1973),” see IX Land & Water L. Rev. 237 (1974).

For case note, “The Entrapment Defense — The Determination of Predisposition. Janski v. State, 538 P.2d 271,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1975),” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 265 (1976).

§ 35-7-1015.
Findings requiring inclusion of substance in Schedule II.

The commissioner shall place a substance in Schedule II if he finds that:

The substance has high potential for abuse;

The substance has currently accepted medical use in treatment in the United States, or currently accepted medical use with severe restrictions; and

Abuse of the substance may lead to severe psychic or physical dependence.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 35-345.15.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 35-7-1016.
Substances included in Schedule II.

The controlled substances listed in this section are included in Schedule II. Schedule II shall consist of the drugs and other substances, by whatever official name, common or usual name, chemical name or brand name designated, listed in this section.

Substances, vegetable origin or chemical synthesis. — Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any of the following substances whether produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, independently by means of chemical synthesis or by combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:

Opium and opiate and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of opium or opiate, excluding apomorphine, thebaine-derived butorphanol, dextrorphan, nalbuphine, nalmefene, naloxone and naltrexone and their respective salts, but including the following:

Raw opium;

Opium extracts;

Opium fluid;

Powdered opium;

Granulated opium;

Tincture of opium;

Codeine;

Ethylmorphine;

Etorphine hydrochloride;

Hydrocodone;

Hydromorphone;

Metopon;

Morphine;

Oxycodone;

Oxymorphone;

Thebaine;

Dihydroetorphine;

Oripavine.

Any salt, compound, isomer, derivative, or preparation thereof which is chemically equivalent or identical with any of the substances referred to in paragraph (b)(i) of this section, but not including the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium;

Opium poppy and poppy straw;

Coca leaves and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of coca leaves (including cocaine and ecgonine and their salts, isomers, derivatives and salts of isomers and derivatives), and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation thereof which is chemically equivalent or identical with any of these substances, but not including decocainized coca leaves or extractions which do not contain cocaine or ecgonine;

Concentrate of poppy straw (the crude extract of poppy straw in either liquid, solid or powder form which contains the phenanthrine alkaloids of the opium poppy).

Opiates. — Unless specifically excepted or unless in another schedule, any of the following opiates including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts and salts of isomers, esters and ethers whenever the existence of these isomers, esters, ethers and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation, dextrorphan and levopropoxyphene excepted:

Alphaprodine;

Anileridine;

Benzitramide;

Bulk dextropropoxyphene (nondosage forms);

Dihydrocodeine;

Diphenoxylate;

Fentanyl;

Isomethadone;

Levomethorphan;

Levorphanol;

Metazocine;

Methadone;

Methadone-Intermediate, 4-cyano-2-dimethylamino-4, 4-diphenyl butane;

Moramide-Intermediate, 2-methyl-3-morpholino-1, 1-diphenyl- propane carboxylic acid;

Pethidine (meperidine);

Pethidine-Intermediate-A, 4-cyano-1-methyl-4-phenylpiperidine;

Pethidine-Intermediate-B, ethyl-4-phenylpiperidine-4-carboxylate;

Pethidine-Intermediate-C, 1-methyl-4-phenylpiperidine-4-carboxylic acid;

Phenazocine;

Piminodine;

Racemethorphan;

Racemorphan;

Sufentanil;

Alfentanil;

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 45, § 2.

Carfentanil;

Levo-alphacetylmethadol; some other names: levo-alpha-acetylmethadol, levomethadyl acetate, LAAM;

Remifentanil;

Tapentadol.

Stimulants. — Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system:

Amphetamine, its salts, optical isomers and salts of its optical isomers;

Methamphetamine, its salts, isomers and salts of its isomers;

Phenmetrazine and its salts;

Methylphenidate;

Lisdexamfetamine, its salts, isomers and salts of isomers.

Depressants. — Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:

Amobarbital;

Pentobarbital;

Phencyclidine;

Secobarbital;

Glutethimide.

Immediate precursors. — Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances:

Immediate precursor to amphetamine and methamphetamine:

Phenylacetone; some trade or other names: phenyl-2-propanone; P2P; benzyl methyl ketone; methyl benzyl ketone.

Immediate precursors to phencyclidine (PCP):

1-phenylcyclohexylamine;

1-piperidinocyclohexanecarbonitrile (PCC).

Hallucinogenic substances:

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 88, § 2.

Nabilone; another name for nabilone: (()-trans-3-(1,1-dimethylheptyl)-6,6a,7,8,10,10a-hexahydro-1-hydroxy-6,6-dimethyl-9H-dibenzo[b,d]pyran-9-one.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.16; Laws 1973, ch. 222, § 1; 1985, ch. 114, § 1; 1997, ch. 151, § 1; 2001, ch. 88, § 2; 2007, ch. 40, § 1; 2011, ch. 45, §§ 1, 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (b)(i)(S), and made a related change.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added (b)(i)(T); repealed former (c)(xxv), which read: “Benzitramide”; and added (c)(xxix) and (d)(v).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subparagraph (b)(i)(I), (b)(i)(L), or (f)(i)(B) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Application. —

Laws 2011, ch. 45, § 3, provides: “The registration requirements for persons who manufacture, distribute or dispense controlled substances in Wyoming specified in
W.S.

35-7-1024

, as amended in section 1 of this act, shall apply to all registrations issued or renewed in calendar year 2011.”

Evidence sufficient. —

Evidence was sufficient to sustain defendant's convictions for possession with intent to deliver methamphetamine, possession of methamphetamine, possession of marijuana, and possession of oxycodone where the drugs were found beneath the car seat in which defendant had been sitting, defendant was under the influence of a controlled substance, he had smoked marijuana earlier in the day, he attempted to evade law enforcement, he changed his story several times, he was carrying a large amount of cash, he refused to identify himself, and he ran when law enforcement attempted to arrest him.
Dettloff v. State, 2007 WY 29, 152 P.3d 376,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2007).

Stated

in

Jackson v. State, 624 P.2d 751,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 277

(Wyo. 1981); Lee v. State, 743 P.2d 296,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 513

(Wyo. 1987).

Cited

in

Jackson v. State, 522 P.2d 1356,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo. 1974); Boyd v. State, 528 P.2d 287,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 247

(Wyo. 1974); Montez v. State, 670 P.2d 694,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 371

(Wyo. 1983); Brown v. State, 738 P.2d 1092,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 461

(Wyo. 1987); Burke v. State, 746 P.2d 852,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 550

(Wyo. 1987); Billis v. State, 800 P.2d 401,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1990); Pisano v. State, 828 P.2d 666,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1992); Vargas-Rocha v. State, 891 P.2d 763,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1995); Nava v. State, 904 P.2d 364,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1995); Rosenbaum v. State, 915 P.2d 1200,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1996); Nixon v. State, 2001 WY 15, 18 P.3d 631,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 2001); Thomas v. State, 2003 WY 53, 67 P.3d 1199,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. 2003).

§ 35-7-1017.
Findings requiring inclusion of substance in Schedule III.

The commissioner shall place a substance in Schedule III if he finds that:

The substance has a potential for abuse less than the substances listed in Schedules I and II;

The substance has currently accepted medical use in treatment in the United States; and

Abuse of the substance may lead to moderate or low physical dependence or high psychological dependence.

The commissioner shall place a substance in Schedule III if he finds that the substance is an anabolic steroid used for the purpose of increasing weight, muscle mass, or improving performance in any form of exercise, sport or game, exclusive of veterinary pharmaceuticals.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 17; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.17; Laws 1991, ch. 19, § 1.